Tennessee, session 114, SB0472.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
All residential educational programs in this state, regardless of type or duration,
that allow minors to participate or to access residential facilities must segregate all
restrooms, changing areas, and showers by sex, as defined in § 1-3-105(c).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 50, Part 8, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
All residential educational programs in this state, regardless of type or duration,
that allow minors to participate or to access residential facilities must segregate all
restrooms, changing areas, and showers by sex, as defined in § 1-3-105(c).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 7, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
All residential educational programs in this state, regardless of type or duration,
that allow minors to participate or to access residential facilities must segregate all
restrooms, changing areas, and showers by sex, as defined in § 1-3-105(c).
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0472
000478
- 1 -